Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 6 AUTHORIZATION AND USE OF VOTING MACHINES AND ELECTRONIC VOTING SYSTEMS
1-5-619. Temporary use of electronic and electromechanical voting systems.

After an electronic or electromechanical voting system has been tested in accordance with section 1-5-608.5 but has not yet been certified by the secretary of state, a voting system provider or designated election official may apply to the secretary of state for temporary approval of the system.

The secretary of state shall, by rule adopted in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., establish standards and procedures for temporary approval of electronic and electromechanical voting systems.

An electronic or electromechanical voting system may be temporarily approved for a total of no more than one year, and the secretary of state may revoke such approval at any time. Temporary approval of a system shall not supersede the certification requirements of this part 6.

A temporarily approved electronic or electromechanical voting system may not be used in any election without the written authorization of the secretary of state.

A designated election official may enter into a contract to rent or lease a temporarily approved electronic or electromechanical voting system for a specific election with the approval of the secretary of state. A political subdivision shall not acquire title to a temporarily approved system.

The use of a temporarily approved electronic or electromechanical voting system shall be valid for all purposes.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1351, § 14, effective May 28.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-620. Electronic or electromechanical voting system information - software.

When a political subdivision purchases or adopts an electronic or electromechanical voting system, the vendor of the system shall send to the secretary of state copies of the software user and operator manuals, and any other information, specifications, or documentation required by the secretary of state relating to a certified system and its equipment. Any such information or materials that are not on file with and approved by the secretary of state, including any updated or modified materials, shall not be used in an election.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1352, § 14, effective May 28.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-621. Compliance - definitions.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon filing of a complaint, the secretary of state shall investigate the complaint and may review or inspect the electronic or electromechanical voting system of a political subdivision at any time, including election day, to determine whether the system complies with the applicable requirements of this part 6 or deviates from a certified system.

A voting system provider or a designated election official using an electronic or electromechanical voting system shall give notice to the secretary of state within twenty-four hours of a malfunction of its system in preparation for or during an election. The notice may be verbal or in writing. For purposes of this section, "malfunction" means a deviation from a correct value in a voting system.

Upon receipt of the notice sent pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the secretary of state shall determine whether further information on the malfunction is required. At the written or verbal request of the secretary of state, the voting system provider or designated election official shall submit a report to the secretary of state's office describing the reprogramming or other actions necessary to correct the malfunction of the electronic or electromechanical voting system. The report shall indicate whether permanent changes are necessary to prevent similar malfunctions in the future. The report shall be submitted within thirty days after the date of the request by the secretary of state. Failure to submit the report within the required period shall be grounds to decertify the system. A copy of the report shall be attached to the most recent certification of the system on file in the secretary of state's office. The secretary of state shall distribute a copy of the report to all political subdivisions that use the system.

If the secretary of state determines after inspecting an electronic or electromechanical voting system or reviewing the report submitted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section that the system does not comply with applicable standards or deviates from a certified system, the secretary shall by written order:

Specify actions to remedy the defect in the electronic or electromechanical voting system and direct the designated election official or voting system provider, as appropriate, to perform such actions;

Prohibit the use of the electronic or electromechanical voting system or any part of the system by a political subdivision that adopted the system for use in an election until the actions to remedy the defect are performed and approved by the secretary of state;

Limit the use of the electronic or electromechanical voting system or any part of the system to circumstances or conditions stated in the order; or

Decertify the electronic or electromechanical voting system.

Upon decertification of an electronic or electromechanical voting system, the secretary of state shall notify all political subdivisions that use the system and the providers of the system that the certification of the system for use and sale in this state is withdrawn. The notice shall be in writing and shall indicate the reasons for the decertification of the system and the effective date of the decertification.

Within thirty days after receiving notice from the secretary of state of the decertification of an electronic or electromechanical voting system, a political subdivision or provider of a voting system that is decertified may request in writing that the secretary of state reconsider its decision to decertify the electronic or electromechanical voting system. Upon receipt of the request, the secretary of state shall hold a public hearing to reconsider the decision to decertify the system. Any interested party may submit testimony or documentation in support of or in opposition to the decision to decertify the system. Following the hearing, the secretary of state may affirm or reverse the decision.

The secretary of state shall amend or rescind an order issued under this section if the secretary of state determines that the electronic or electromechanical voting system has been modified to comply with applicable standards or no longer deviates from the certified system.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1352, § 14, effective May 28.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-5-622. Special rules applicable to 2007 retesting of voting systems - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 3, § 1, effective February 11.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2009. (See L. 2008, p. 3.)

1-5-623. Special rules applicable to use, modification, or purchase of electronic voting devices or systems and related components prior to 2014 - legislative declaration - rules.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that, over the past decade, voting technology used in the state has undergone dramatic changes, creating confusion and difficulties for election administrators, state government, and the voting public. Efforts to address this confusion have been complicated by the timing of periodic substantial investments in voting technology by county governments necessitated by changes in federal and state law.

Now, therefore, by enacting this section, the general assembly intends that:

Between May 15, 2009, and the 2014 general election, any voting system purchased by a political subdivision shall be a paper-based voting system as defined in section 1-1-104 (23.5);

The acquisition of electronic voting systems be suspended in order to assess existing and emerging voting technologies; and

Substantial investment by political subdivisions before the 2014 general election in alternate technologies that will frustrate the intent of the general assembly as specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) is discouraged and disfavored.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 6, any existing electronic voting device or any related component of the device that was used by a political subdivision in conducting the 2008 general election may continue to be used by the political subdivision on and after May 15, 2009, as long as the device or component is used in accordance with either the conditions of use under which the device or component was originally certified for the 2008 general election or in accordance with alternate conditions of use established by the secretary of state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and after May 15, 2009, no political subdivision may purchase a new electronic voting device or system or any related component of such device or system without obtaining the prior approval of the secretary of state for such purchase in accordance with the requirements of this subsection (3).

Subject to the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), if a political subdivision desires to purchase a new electronic voting device or system or any related component of such device or system, the political subdivision shall submit a written application to the secretary of state for approval of the purchase. The application shall be made by means of any forms or procedures established by the secretary. Within three business days of receiving the application, the secretary shall grant or deny the application. In reviewing the application, the secretary shall consider, among other relevant factors, the total effect of the purchase at issue in light of other purchases by the political subdivision on voting systems or components of such systems on or after May 15, 2009, and the needs of the political subdivision. In making the determination, the secretary shall prevent political subdivisions from making substantial investments in alternate technologies that will frustrate the intent of the general assembly as specified in subsection (1) of this section and shall consider, among other relevant factors:

Whether the purchase is intended to replace damaged or defective equipment or to accommodate an increase in population in the political subdivision;

Whether the purchase requires a new contract or agreement that would be entered into by the political subdivision and one or more vendors; and

A comparison of the purchase under review with the average capital expenditures by the political subdivision on the administration of elections on an annual basis for the four consecutive years prior to the year in which the application is submitted in order to discourage an investment in technology with a limited useful life in accordance with the intent of the general assembly as specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as may be necessary to administer and enforce any requirement of this section, including any rules necessary to specify permissible conditions of use governing electronic voting devices or systems or related components of such devices or systems in accordance with the requirements of this part 6.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1192, § 8, effective May 15.